Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2307
Contractor; certificate of competency; application; examination; issuance.

(1) Any person desiring to engage in business as an air conditioning air distribution contractor in a city or village which has established an air conditioning air distribution board or within the extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of cities of the metropolitan class if such city has such a board, shall secure a certificate of competency. Any person desiring to engage in the business, or to proceed to install, alter, repair, clean, or add to or change in any manner any air conditioning air distribution system or any furnace, restaurant appliance hood and duct system, or other exhaust or intake ventilating system within such city or village or within the extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of cities of the metropolitan class shall be the holder of a certificate of competency or in the direct employ of a person, firm, or corporation holding such certificate.

(2) The air conditioning air distribution board shall, upon written application, examine the applicant at its next meeting or at an adjourned meeting as to his or her practical and theoretical knowledge of the designing and installing of residential, commercial, and industrial air conditioning air distribution and ventilating systems and, if found competent, deliver to the applicant a certificate of competency.

Laws 1969, c. 98, § 7, p. 470;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 77;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 151.